New York, session 2025-2026, A2163.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4-a of section 2222 of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as amended by section 1 of part MM of chapter 58 of the laws of 3 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 4-a. Additional fee. (a) In addition to the other fees provided for in 5 paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of subdivision four of this section the 6 commissioner shall, upon application in such cases for the registration 7 of a snowmobile or the renewal thereof, collect the annual one hundred 8 twenty-five dollar fee for residents and one hundred twenty-five dollar 9 fee for nonresidents or a fifty-five dollar fee for residents and 10 fifty-five dollar fee for nonresidents who provide proof, at the time of 11 registration, that such individual is a member of an organized New York 12 state snowmobile club that is a member of the New York state snowmobile 13 association or is a member of an organized New York state snowmobile 14 club that is a trail maintenance entity and a member of the New York 15 state snowmobile association which are imposed by section 21.07 of the 16 parks, recreation and historic preservation law. In the event that an 17 individual seeking snowmobile club membership is unable, for any reason, 18 to secure such club membership, [he or she] they may contact the New 19 York state snowmobile association, who shall secure such membership for 20 such person. This fee shall also be collected from dealers at the time 21 of original registration and at the time of each renewal. [The commis- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04594-03-5 A. 2163--B 2 1 sioner shall effectuate regulations regarding what is required as proof 2 of membership in an organized New York state snowmobile club that is a 3 trail maintenance entity and a member of the New York state snowmobile 4 association for the purposes of this subdivision.] 5 (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdivi- 6 sion, in addition to the other fees provided for in paragraphs (a), (b), 7 (c) and (f) of subdivision four of this section, the commissioner shall, 8 upon application in such cases for the registration of a snowmobile 9 manufactured more than thirty years prior to the current calendar year 10 or the renewal thereof, collect the annual one hundred twenty-five 11 dollar fee for residents and one hundred twenty-five dollar fee for 12 nonresidents or a twenty dollar fee for residents and twenty dollar fee 13 for nonresidents who provide proof, at the time of registration, that 14 such individual is a member of an organized New York state snowmobile 15 club that is a member of the New York state snowmobile association or is 16 a member of an organized New York state snowmobile club that is a trail 17 maintenance entity and a member of the New York state snowmobile associ- 18 ation which are imposed by section 21.07 of the parks, recreation and 19 historic preservation law. In the event that an individual seeking 20 snowmobile club membership is unable, for any reason, to secure such 21 club membership, such person may contact the New York state snowmobile 22 association, who shall secure such membership for such person. 23 (c) The commissioner shall effectuate regulations regarding what is 24 required as proof of membership in an organized New York state snowmo- 25 bile club that is a trail maintenance entity and a member of the New 26 York state snowmobile association for the purposes of this subdivision. 27 § 2. Subdivision 4 of section 2222 of the vehicle and traffic law is 28 amended by adding a new paragraph (f) to read as follows: 29 (f) A fee of five dollars for each individual resident and non-resi- 30 dent registration of a snowmobile manufactured more than thirty years 31 prior to the current calendar year. 32 § 3. Subdivision 8 of section 2222 of the vehicle and traffic law, as 33 added by chapter 839 of the laws of 1973, is amended to read as follows: 34 8. The validating date tag. At the time of the original registration 35 and at the time of each annual renewal thereof, the commissioner shall 36 also issue to said registrant a date tag or tags indicating the validity 37 of the current registration and the expiration date thereof, which vali- 38 dating date tag or tags should be affixed to the snowmobile in such 39 manner as the commissioner may prescribe. Notwithstanding the fact that 40 a snowmobile has been assigned an identifying number, it shall not be 41 considered as validly registered within the meaning of this section 42 unless a validating date tag and current registration certificate have 43 been issued. The commissioner may develop a vintage design for the date 44 tag or tags issued to a snowmobile manufactured more than thirty years 45 prior to the current calendar year. 46 § 4. Subdivision 2 of section 21.07 of the parks, recreation and 47 historic preservation law, as amended by section 2 of part MM of chapter 48 58 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 49 2. (a) Notwithstanding the fee as established in subdivision one of 50 this section, an individual resident or nonresident registering a snow- 51 mobile who provides proof at the time of registration, that such indi- 52 vidual is a member of an organized New York state snowmobile club that 53 is a member of the New York state snowmobile association or is a member 54 of an organized New York state snowmobile club that is a trail mainte- 55 nance entity and a member of the New York state snowmobile association, 56 shall pay fifty-five dollars for each snowmobile for the snowmobile A. 2163--B 3 1 trail development and maintenance fund in addition to the registration 2 required by the vehicle and traffic law. In the event that an individual 3 seeking snowmobile club membership is unable, for any reason, to secure 4 such club membership, [he or she] such person may contact the New York 5 state snowmobile association, who shall secure such membership for such 6 person. 7 (b) Notwithstanding the fee as established in subdivision one of this 8 section and paragraph (a) of this subdivision, a fee of one hundred 9 twenty-five dollars is hereby imposed upon the resident, and one hundred 10 twenty-five dollars upon the nonresident, owner of a snowmobile manufac- 11 tured more than thirty years prior to the current calendar year for the 12 snowmobile trail development and maintenance fund to be paid to the 13 commissioner of motor vehicles upon the registration thereof in addition 14 to the registration fee required by the vehicle and traffic law, the 15 payment of which fee hereby imposed shall be a condition precedent to 16 such individual resident or individual nonresident registration. 17 Provided, however, an individual resident or nonresident registering a 18 snowmobile manufactured more than thirty years prior to the current 19 calendar year who provides proof, at the time of registration, that such 20 individual is a member of an organized New York state snowmobile club 21 that is a member of the New York state snowmobile association or is a 22 member of an organized New York state snowmobile club that is a trail 23 maintenance entity and a member of the New York state snowmobile associ- 24 ation, shall pay twenty dollars for each such snowmobile for the snowmo- 25 bile trail development and maintenance fund in addition to the registra- 26 tion required by the vehicle and traffic law. In the event that an 27 individual seeking snowmobile club membership is unable, for any reason, 28 to secure such club membership, they may contact the New York state 29 snowmobile association, who shall secure such membership for such 30 person. 31 § 5. This act shall take effect December 31, 2028. Effective imme- 32 diately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation 33 necessary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 34 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date.